Utah statutes.
4-19-4.   Utah Rural Rehabilitation Fund.

(1)  The department shall deposit all income generated from the administration of the rural rehabilitation program in a separate fund known as the "Utah Rural Rehabilitation Fund."

(2)  The state treasurer shall maintain the Utah Rural Rehabilitation Fund and record all debits and credits made to the fund by the department.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

